Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1190XS (6) 91 dg/ko S.F. 122 Section 1. Section 237A.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2, 3 if at least one of a childâs parents is under eighteen years of 4 age, the child shall automatically be eligible for state child 5 care assistance. 6 Sec. 2. Section 237A.13, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. A child that is eligible for state child 9 care assistance under subsection 2A. 10